src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_LEPPYÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 p~0 y
!!€  leppyä: leppyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # settle
0:py  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:yt  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KIVETTYÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 t~0 y
!!€  kivettyä: kivettyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # stone
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:yt  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_VIITTOA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 t~0 o
!!€  viittoa: viittoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # sign
0:to  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_HERMOTTUA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 t~0 u
!!€  hermottua: hermottua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # nerve
0:tu  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_MÄIKYÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 k~0’ y
!!€  mäikyä: mäikyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # bong
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:yt  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_TAKOA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 k~0’ o
!!€  takoa: takoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # hammer
0:ko  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_MAUKUA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 k~0’ u
!!€  maukua: maukua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # gong
0:ku  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:’u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:’u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:’u  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:’ut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:’ut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ELPYÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 p~v y
!!€  elpyä: elpyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # rescuscitate
0:py  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:vy  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:vy  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vy  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vyt  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:vyt  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:py  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_HIIPUA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 p~v u
!!€  hiipua: hiipua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # fizzle
0:pu  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:vu  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:vu  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vu  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SILPOA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 p~v o
!!€  silpoa: silpoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # slash
0:po  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:vo  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:vo  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vo  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KIETOA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 t~d o
!!€  kietoa: kietoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # entangle
0:to  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:do  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:do  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:do  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SILIYTYÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 t~d y
!!€  siliytyä: siliytyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # iron
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:dy  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:dy  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:dy  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dyt  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:dyt  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ty  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ROHTUA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 t~d u
!!€  rohtua: rohtua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # scar
0:tu  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:du  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:du  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:du  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tu  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_VINKUA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 k~g u
!!€  vinkua: vinkua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # squeal
0:ku  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:gu  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:gu  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:gu  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:gut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:gut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PENKOA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 k~g o
!!€  penkoa: penkoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # dig
0:ko  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:go  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:go  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:go  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:got  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:got  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;
