src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
aikoa+V:ai  VERB_TAKOA  ;
arpoa+V:ar  VERB_SILPOA  ;
assimiloitua+V:assimiloi  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
aukoa+V:au  VERB_TAKOA  ;
elpyä+V:el  VERB_ELPYÄ  ;
eriytyä+V:eriy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
erottautua+V:erottau  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
etoa+V:e  VERB_KIETOA  ;
haaroittua+V:haaroit  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
haipua+V:hai  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
halkoa+V:hal  VERB_TAKOA  ;
harhautua+V:harhau  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
hautoa+V:hau  VERB_KIETOA  ;
heittyä+V:heit  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
hiipua+V:hii  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
hikeytyä+V:hikey  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
hinkua+V:hin  VERB_VINKUA  ;
hipoa+V:hi  VERB_SILPOA  ;
hiukoa+V:hiu  VERB_TAKOA  ;
houkuttua+V:houkut  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
huhtoa+V:huh  VERB_KIETOA  ;
huitoa+V:hui  VERB_KIETOA  ;
huopua+V:huo  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
huuhtoa+V:huuh  VERB_KIETOA  ;
hyhmettyä+V:hyhmet  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
hyökyä+V:hyö  VERB_MÄIKYÄ  ;
häipyä+V:häi  VERB_ELPYÄ  ;
höyläytyä+V:höyläy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
indusoitua+V:indusoi  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
itkettyä+V:itket  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
juopua+V:juo  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
juustottua+V:juustot  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
järjestäytyä+V:järjestäy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
kaivautua+V:kaivau  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
kakoa+V:ka  VERB_TAKOA  ;
karvoittua+V:karvoit  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
kehittyä+V:kehit  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
keräytyä+V:keräy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
kesannoitua+V:kesannoi  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
kesyttyä+V:kesyt  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
kiehtoa+V:kieh  VERB_KIETOA  ;
kietoa+V:kie  VERB_KIETOA  ;
kirpeytyä+V:kirpey  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
kohmettua+V:kohmet  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
korreloitua+V:korreloi  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
kuorettua+V:kuoret  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
kuroutua+V:kurou  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
kutoa+V:ku  VERB_KIETOA  ;
kuumatakoa+V:kuumata  VERB_TAKOA  ;
kylmätakoa+V:kylmäta  VERB_TAKOA  ;
kyynelöityä+V:kyynelöi  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
känsittyä+V:känsit  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
latoa+V:la  VERB_KIETOA  ;
laukoa+V:lau  VERB_TAKOA  ;
leipoa+V:lei  VERB_SILPOA  ;
leiriytyä+V:leiriy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
leppyä+V:lep  VERB_LEPPYÄ  ;
liehtoa+V:lieh  VERB_KIETOA  ;
liikakansoittua+V:liikakansoit  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
liittyä+V:liit  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
lipoa+V:li  VERB_SILPOA  ;
lipua+V:li  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
liukua+V:liu  VERB_MAUKUA  ;
loikoa+V:loi  VERB_TAKOA  ;
lommoutua+V:lommou  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
lujittua+V:lujit  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
luopua+V:luo  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
läkähtyä+V:läkäh  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
lännettyä+V:lännet  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
mankua+V:man  VERB_VINKUA  ;
maukua+V:mau  VERB_MAUKUA  ;
modernisoitua+V:modernisoi  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
monkua+V:mon  VERB_VINKUA  ;
moukua+V:mou  VERB_MAUKUA  ;
muuttua+V:muut  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
mäikyä+V:mäi  VERB_MÄIKYÄ  ;
määkyä+V:mää  VERB_MÄIKYÄ  ;
määrittyä+V:määrit  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
naukua+V:nau  VERB_MAUKUA  ;
nesteytyä+V:nestey  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
näkyä+V:nä  VERB_MÄIKYÄ  ;
oikoa+V:oi  VERB_TAKOA  ;
painottua+V:painot  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
parkkiutua+V:parkkiu  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
penkoa+V:pen  VERB_PENKOA  ;
pettyä+V:pet  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
piikoa+V:pii  VERB_TAKOA  ;
pinkoa+V:pin  VERB_PENKOA  ;
pynttäytyä+V:pynttäy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
pöhöttyä+V:pöhöt  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
raiskautua+V:raiskau  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
rasvoittua+V:rasvoit  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
reuhtoa+V:reuh  VERB_KIETOA  ;
riepoa+V:rie  VERB_SILPOA  ;
riipoa+V:rii  VERB_SILPOA  ;
riuhtoa+V:riuh  VERB_KIETOA  ;
ryhmittäytyä+V:ryhmittäy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
räikyä+V:räi  VERB_MÄIKYÄ  ;
rämettyä+V:rämet  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
rääkyä+V:rää  VERB_MÄIKYÄ  ;
saapua+V:saa  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
silpoa+V:sil  VERB_SILPOA  ;
sirottua+V:sirot  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
sirpaloitua+V:sirpaloi  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
sitkeytyä+V:sitkey  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
suopua+V:suo  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
syöpyä+V:syö  VERB_ELPYÄ  ;
särkyä+V:sär  VERB_MÄIKYÄ  ;
tahtoa+V:tah  VERB_KIETOA  ;
taikoa+V:tai  VERB_TAKOA  ;
taipua+V:tai  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
takoa+V:ta  VERB_TAKOA  ;
tarjoutua+V:tarjou  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
tarpoa+V:tar  VERB_SILPOA  ;
tavuttua+V:tavut  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
toipua+V:toi  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
tyydyttyä+V:tyydyt  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
tälläytyä+V:tälläy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
uupua+V:uu  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
vaipua+V:vai  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
vakuuttua+V:vakuut  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
valiutua+V:valiu  VERB_ROHTUA  ;
velkoa+V:vel  VERB_TAKOA  ;
vihtoa+V:vih  VERB_KIETOA  ;
viipyä+V:vii  VERB_ELPYÄ  ;
viittoa+V:viit  VERB_VIITTOA  ;
vinkua+V:vin  VERB_VINKUA  ;
virittyä+V:virit  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
virkistäytyä+V:virkistäy  VERB_SILIYTYÄ  ;
virpoa+V:vir  VERB_SILPOA  ;
viuhtoa+V:viuh  VERB_KIETOA  ;
voipua+V:voi  VERB_HIIPUA  ;
vonkua+V:von  VERB_VINKUA  ;
ylivalottua+V:ylivalot  VERB_HERMOTTUA  ;
yöpyä+V:yö  VERB_ELPYÄ  ;
ärsyttyä+V:ärsyt  VERB_KIVETTYÄ  ;
